District of Columbia statutes.
42-604

General warranty.

A covenant by the grantor, in a deed conveying real estate, “that he will warrant generally the property hereby conveyed,” or a grant of real estate in which the granting words are followed by the words “with general warranty,” shall have the same effect as if the grantor had covenanted that he, his heirs, devisees, and personal representatives will warrant and defend the said property unto the grantee, his heirs, devisees, personal representatives, and assigns against the claims and demands of all persons whomsoever.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1269, ch. 854, § 506

History

1981 Ed., § 45-504.
1973 Ed., § 45-304.

Prior Codifications